02_Morphology/practical.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>               ! Noun
%<pl%>              ! Plural
%<adv%>              ! Adjective
%<gen%>             ! Genitive


LEXICON Root
Noun;

LEXICON PLURAL_S
tree%<n%>%<pl%>:trees #;
cow%<n%>%<pl%>:cows #;
cat%<n%>%<pl%>:cats #;
neighbour%<n%>%<pl%>:neighbours #;
rainbow%<n%>%<pl%>:rainbows #;
star%<n%>%<pl%>:stars #;
hat%<n%>%<pl%>:hats #;


LEXICON PLURAL_ES
class%<n%>%<pl%>: classes #;
glass%<n%>%<pl%>:glasses #;
watch%<n%>%<pl%>:watches #;

LEXICON PLURAL_IES
family%<n%>%<pl%>:families #;
ally%<n%>%<pl%>:allies #;
bakery%<n%>%<pl%>:bakeries #;
city%<n%>%<pl%>:cities #;


LEXICON CASE_S
man%<n%>%<gen%>: man's #;
teacher%<n%>%<gen%>:teacher's #;
woman%<n%>%<gen%>: woman's #;

LEXICON DERIVATIONS
friend%<n%>%<adv%>:friendly #;
cloud%<n%>%<adv%>:cloudy #;
sun%<n%>%<adv%>:sunny #;


LEXICON Noun
PLURAL_S;
PLURAL_ES;
PLURAL_IES;
CASE_S;
DERIVATIONS;
